Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5724.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 167
DETENTION FOR FEDERAL CIVIL IMMIGRATION VIOLATIONS
42-167-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Detention for Federal Civil
Immigration Violations".
42-167-2. Prohibition on agreements to detain individuals for federal civil
immigration violations.
(a) No state or municipal governmental official or body, or instrumentality or agency
thereof, may enter into or renew any contract, intergovernmental service agreement, memorandum
of understanding or any other agreement to detain individuals for federal civil immigration
violations.
(b) A state official or body, or instrumentality or agency thereof, with an existing contract,
intergovernmental service agreement, memorandum of understanding or other agreement that is
used, whether in whole or part, to detain individuals for federal civil immigration violations, shall
exercise the termination provision in the contract, intergovernmental service agreement,
memorandum of understanding or other agreement as applied to detaining individuals for federal

civil immigration violations no later than July 1, 2026.
42-167-3. Prohibition from using public resources to facilitate detaining individuals
for federal civil immigration violations.
No state or municipal governmental official or body, or instrumentality or agency thereof,
shall:
(1) Sell, trade, lease or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property belonging to the
state or municipal governmental body or entity for the purpose of facilitating the establishment or
operation of a facility that detains or will detain individuals for federal civil immigration violations;
(2) Use state or municipal governmental funds or assets to pay, reimburse, subsidize or
defray in anyway any cost related to the sale, purchase, construction, development, ownership,
management or operation of a facility that detains or will detain individuals for federal civil
immigration violations;
(3) Receive per diem per detainee payments or any other payments related to a facility that
detains or will detain individuals for federal civil immigration violations;
(4) Otherwise give any financial incentive or benefit in connection with the sale, purchase,
construction, development, ownership, management or operation of a facility that detains or will
detain individuals for federal civil immigration violations; or
(5) Impose or continue in effect any law, ordinance, policy or regulation that violates or
conflicts with the provisions of this chapter.
42-167-4. Severability.
If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part of this chapter shall be adjudged by any
court of competent jurisdiction to be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid, that judgment shall not
affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of this chapter but shall be confined in its operation to
the clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part directly involved in the controversy in which that
judgment shall have been rendered.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001255
========
LC001255 - Page 2 of 3